Texas statutes.
GOVERNMENT CODE

TITLE 2. JUDICIAL BRANCH

SUBTITLE K. SPECIALTY COURTS

CHAPTER 122. FAMILY DRUG COURT PROGRAM

Sec. 122.001. FAMILY DRUG COURT PROGRAM DEFINED. In this chapter, "family drug court program" means a program that has the following essential characteristics:

(1) the integration of substance abuse treatment services in the processing of civil cases in the child welfare system with the goal of family reunification;

(2) the use of a comprehensive case management approach involving Department of Family and Protective Services caseworkers, court-appointed case managers, and court-appointed special advocates to rehabilitate a parent who has had a child removed from the parent's care by the department because of suspected child abuse or neglect and who is suspected of substance abuse;

(3) early identification and prompt placement of eligible parents who volunteer to participate in the program;

(4) comprehensive substance abuse needs assessment and referral to an appropriate substance abuse treatment agency;

(5) a progressive treatment approach with specific requirements that a parent must meet to advance to the next phase of the program;

(6) monitoring of abstinence through periodic alcohol or other drug testing;

(7) ongoing judicial interaction with program participants;

(8) monitoring and evaluation of program goals and effectiveness;

(9) continuing interdisciplinary education to promote effective program planning, implementation, and operations; and

(10) development of partnerships with public agencies and community organizations.

Added by Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 268 (S.B. 6), Sec. 1.63, eff. September 1, 2005.

Transferred, redesignated and amended from Family Code, Subchapter J, Chapter 264 by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 747 (S.B. 462), Sec. 1.02, eff. September 1, 2013.

Sec. 122.002. AUTHORITY TO ESTABLISH PROGRAM. The commissioners court of a county may establish a family drug court program for persons who:

(1) have had a child removed from their care by the Department of Family and Protective Services; and

(2) are suspected by the Department of Family and Protective Services or a court of having a substance abuse problem.

Added by Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 268 (S.B. 6), Sec. 1.63, eff. September 1, 2005.

Transferred, redesignated and amended from Family Code, Subchapter J, Chapter 264 by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 747 (S.B. 462), Sec. 1.02, eff. September 1, 2013.

Sec. 122.003. PARTICIPANT PAYMENT FOR TREATMENT AND SERVICES. A family drug court program may require a participant to pay the cost of all treatment and services received while participating in the program, based on the participant's ability to pay.

Added by Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 268 (S.B. 6), Sec. 1.63, eff. September 1, 2005.

Transferred, redesignated and amended from Family Code, Subchapter J, Chapter 264 by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 747 (S.B. 462), Sec. 1.02, eff. September 1, 2013.

Sec. 122.004. FUNDING. A county creating a family drug court under this chapter shall explore the possibility of using court improvement project funds to finance the family drug court in the county. The county shall also explore the availability of federal and state matching funds to finance the court.

Added by Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 268 (S.B. 6), Sec. 1.63, eff. September 1, 2005.

Transferred, redesignated and amended from Family Code, Subchapter J, Chapter 264 by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 747 (S.B. 462), Sec. 1.02, eff. September 1, 2013.